Hawaii statutes.
§641-2 Review on and disposition of appeal.
[(a)] In case of appeal from a judgment, order, or decree of a circuit or
district court or the land court, in a civil matter, the appellate court shall
have power to review, reverse, affirm, amend, or modify such judgment, order,
or decree, in whole or in part, as to any or all of the parties. It may enter
an amended or modified judgment, order, or decree, or may remand the case to
the trial court for the entry of the same or for other or further proceedings,
as in its opinion the facts and law warrant. Any judgment, order, or decree
entered by the appellate court may be enforced by it or remitted for
enforcement by the trial court.

[(b)] Every appeal shall be taken on the
record, and no new evidence shall be introduced in the supreme court. The
appellate court may correct any error appearing on the record, but need not
consider a point that was not presented in the trial court in an appropriate
manner. No judgment, order, or decree shall be reversed, amended, or modified
for any error or defect, unless the court is of the opinion that it has
injuriously affected the substantial rights of the appellant. [L 1892, c 57,
§70; RL 1925, §2511; RL 1935, §3503; RL 1945, §9505; RL 1955, §208-5; HRS
§641-4; am L 1970, c 188, §39; am L 1972, c 89, pt of §5; ren HRS §641-2; am L
2004, c 202, §67; am L 2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

Preservation of error, prejudicial error as requisites, see
HRCP rules 46, 61.

Case Notes

Under certain conditions, judgment can be reversed on legal
theory not raised before. 56 H. 466, 540 P.2d 978 (1975).

Supreme court cannot disregard jurisdictional defects in an
appeal. 57 H. 61, 549 P.2d 477 (1976).

Appellate court was not precluded from considering equity
defense of unclean hands raised for the first time on appeal. 57 H. 215, 553
P.2d 733 (1976).

Evidence outside trial record may not be referred to in
appellate brief unless approved by trial court pursuant to HRCP rule 75(c). 57
H. 405, 557 P.2d 125 (1976).

Court's power to render final judgment on reversal should be
exercised where the result would be foreordained on remand. 58 H. 345, 569
P.2d 884 (1977).

Trial court's possible error in granting directed verdict
found to be harmless in light of subsequent jury instructions. 60 H. 214, 587
P.2d 1229 (1978).

Where surviving spouse failed to show how family court's
erroneous finding of fact affected the court's decision, the erroneous finding
did not affect surviving spouse's substantial rights and did not constitute
reversible error. 100 H. 397, 60 P.3d 798 (2003).

Mentioned: 74 H. 210, 847 P.2d 652 (1992).

Scope of review. Review of factual issues, see 42 H. 250, 256
(1957); 42 H. 264, 267 (1958); 45 H. 83, 86-87, 363 P.2d 964 (1961). To extent
governed by Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP rule 52(a), construed in
42 H. 111, 116 (1957); 42 H. 286, 297 (1958); 43 H. 76, 82 (1958); 43 H. 119,
124 (1959); 44 H. 327, 342, 359 P.2d 164 (1960); 44 H. 582, 358 P.2d 53 (1960),
den'g reh'g of 44 H. 464, 355 P.2d 25 (1960); 45 H. 128, 139, 363 P.2d 969
(1961); 45 H. 232, 233-234, 364 P.2d 646 (1961); 45 H. 445, 452, 370 P.2d 463
(1962); 45 H. 521, 550-551, 371 P.2d 379 (1962); 46 H. 233, 238, 377 P.2d 708
(1962); 46 H. 353, 364, 380 P.2d 488 (1963); 46 H. 475, 513-514, 382 P.2d 920
(1963); 47 H. 145, 147, 384 P.2d 300 (1963); 47 H. 220, 225, 386 P.2d 855
(1963); 47 H. 577, 585, 393 P.2d 89 (1964); 48 H. 152, 168, 397 P.2d 593
(1964); 48 H. 193, 202, 397 P.2d 552 (1964), reh'g den. 48 H. 391, 402 P.2d 678
(1965); 49 H. 62, 68, 412 P.2d 326 (1966); 49 H. 160, 180, 413 P.2d 221 (1966);
49 H. 661, 667, 426 P.2d 816 (1967).

Cases decided before adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil
Procedure.

Newly discovered evidence, admissibility of, effect. 3 H. 64
(1867); 7 H. 573 (1889); 14 H. 204 (1902); 33 H. 98 (1934); 38 H. 605 (1950). Review
generally on the record. 14 H. 204 (1902); 23 H. 571, 572 (1917).

In equitable actions, findings of trial judge not binding on
supreme court and may make its own findings. 15 H. 526 (1904); 22 H. 288
(1914); 28 H. 590, 662 (1925); 29 H. 638 (1927); 33 H. 701 (1927); 34 H. 363
(1937); 34 H. 228 (1937); 34 H. 303 (1937); 39 H. 185 (1952); 158 F.2d 122
(1946); see also 23 H. 646, 649 (1917). In equity case, presumption correctly
decided. 22 H. 391 (1914). In the case of conflicting evidence, findings
entitled to great weight. 10 H. 308 (1896); 15 H. 526 (1904); 22 H. 17 (1914);
22 H. 391 (1914); 25 H. 22, 33 (1919); 26 H. 137 (1921); 29 H. 638 (1927); 29 H.
698 (1927); 30 H. 446 (1928); 32 H. 659 (1933); 32 H. 751 (1933); 33 H. 745
(1936); 33 H. 846 (1936); 34 H. 87, 91 (1937); 38 H. 616 (1950); 40 H. 279
(1953); 40 H. 386 (1954). Even though the evidence be meager, if sustains
findings, will not be disturbed. 24 H. 277 (1918). Where evidence is of
slight weight and doubtful character, findings not followed. 33 H. 701 (1936);
35 H. 689 (1940). In divorce cases; supreme court will draw its own
conclusions; in cases turning wholly or largely on credibility of witnesses or
weight of evidence, findings of trial judge accorded much weight. 21 H. 339
(1912); 22 H. 189 (1914); 29 H. 866 (1927); 30 H. 240 (1927); 34 H. 312 (1937);
36 H. 49 (1942); 37 H. 512 (1947); should control unless the evidence clearly requires
the contrary conclusion. 32 H. 177 (1931).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next